Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 6

Continuing Education

62-5-601. Continuing education requirement for license renewals.

Every licensed embalmer holding a Tennessee license shall submit with the renewal application evidence of satisfactory completion of a continuing education program in mortuary science approved by the board.

Every licensed funeral director holding a Tennessee license shall submit with the renewal application evidence of satisfactory completion of a continuing education program in funeral directing approved by the board.

Each licensee holding a Tennessee license shall submit with the license renewal application satisfactory proof of completion of a minimum of ten (10) hours of continuing education coursework approved by the board. Compliance with the continuing education coursework is mandatory for renewal of a license. Of the ten (10) hours of continuing education coursework, five (5) hours must be attended in person. For purposes of this subsection (c), “attended in person” means the continuing education coursework is completed by the licensee in the physical presence of the provider of the coursework or is completed by the licensee through an interactive virtual program that requires participants to confirm their presence during the program.

Any licensee who is sixty-five (65) years of age or older or who has held a license continuously for ten (10) years on or before October 1, 2000, shall be exempt from the continuing education requirements in this chapter. In addition, a licensee who demonstrates to the board on the prescribed form that the licensee is disabled and is not practicing either funeral directing or embalming is exempt from the continuing education requirements set forth in this chapter.

The board, for good cause, shall have the power to excuse licensees from the continuing education requirements set forth in this chapter.

Continuing education credit or credits may be obtained by attending and participating in continuing education courses or workshops approved by the board.

No continuing education hours from one licensing period may be carried over to a subsequent licensing period.

Acts 1997, ch. 275, § 2; 2017, ch. 154, § 1.

62-5-602. Reciprocity for nonresident licensees.

A nonresident licensee of this state who holds a valid license as a funeral director or embalmer issued by another state may satisfy continuing education requirements through reciprocity, if the out-of-state credits meet the minimum standard requirements of this chapter.

Acts 1997, ch. 275, § 3.

62-5-603. Approval of courses — Qualification.

A continuing education course or workshop shall be qualified for approval if the board determines that it:

Constitutes an organized program of learning, including a symposium, that contributes directly to the professional competency of the licensee;

Is related to the practice of mortuary science or funeral directing;

Is conducted by individuals considered experts in the subject matter of the program by reason of education, training or experience; and

Is accompanied by a paper, manual or written outline that substantially describes the subject matter of the program.

Acts 1997, ch. 275, § 4.

62-5-604. Credit for serving as lecturer or discussion leader.

A licensee who serves as a lecturer or discussion leader of an approved continuing education course or workshop may satisfy up to twenty-five percent (25%) of the continuing education requirement. Repetitious presentations shall be counted once.

Acts 1997, ch. 275, § 5.

62-5-605. Application for approval — Reports.

Any organization or individual wishing to hold seminars with employees or other licensees shall:

Submit to the board no less than sixty (60) days from the planned event an application supplied by the board outlining the event, speaker and course description; provided, that for good cause, an amendment to the application may be submitted to the board no less than thirty (30) days from the planned event; and

Upon completion of an application, be notified of the approval or disapproval of the course a minimum of thirty (30) days before the courses are offered, or upon completion of an amendment, be notified of the approval or disapproval of the amendment a minimum of ten (10) days before the courses are offered; and

Following a seminar, submit paperwork within thirty (30) days with the following information:

Name of person attending;

License number;

Date of attendance; and

Hours completed.

The board may waive the requirements of subsection (a) and approve continuing education courses for good cause shown.

Acts 1997, ch. 275, § 6; 2001, ch. 187, § 1.

62-5-606. Written list of approved courses.

The board may annually or on request provide licensees with a written list of approved continuing education courses. This list shall include course offerings not only in this state but also other states as deemed necessary by the board in order to make available a wide variety of courses and offerings to its licensees.

Acts 1997, ch. 275, § 7.

62-5-607. Review of approved courses.

Each continuing education course approved by the board may subsequently be reviewed and, upon evidence of significant variation from the program application submitted, all or any part of the approved hours may be disapproved.

The board or its representative shall be admitted to continuing education courses at no charge in order to monitor the licensees present, the content of the course and supporting paperwork.

Acts 1997, ch. 275, § 8.

62-5-608. Oversight committee.

The board may appoint a committee to oversee the application process and monitoring of continuing education programs.

In the event of a denial, in whole or in part, of any application for accreditation or approval of a continuing education course or workshop, the applicant or licensee shall have a right to a conference before the continuing education committee of the board. If dissatisfied with the ruling of the committee, the applicant or licensee may be granted a conference before the full board.

Acts 1997, ch. 275, § 9.

62-5-609. Proof of coursework required for license renewal.

Each applicant for renewal of a funeral director's or embalmer's license in this state shall submit the renewal fee accompanied by written proof of each continuing education course or courses the person has attended during the previous two (2) years. No applications for renewal will be considered without complete documentation of the continuing education hours and the renewal fee, unless exempted by this chapter.

Acts 1997, ch. 275, § 10.

Cross-References. License renewals, § 62-5-315.

62-5-610. Failure to meet requirements — Falsification of course records.

The license of any funeral director or embalmer who has not met the continuing education requirements prescribed in this chapter shall not be renewed.

Any licensee who submits credits for continuing education hours not attended or incomplete or submits falsified information shall be subject to discipline by the board.

Acts 1997, ch. 275, § 11.

Cross-References. License renewals, § 62-5-315.

62-5-611. Withdrawal of approval for program.

Approval of any continuing education program may be withdrawn by the board if:

The establishment or conduct of a program violates or fails to meet the requirements of this chapter or other applicable laws; or

The information contained in the application for approval is materially inaccurate or misleading.

Acts 1997, ch. 275, § 12.